Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Operation

16-11-201. Transfers between courts.

Any cause pending in the chancery court may be transferred, by consent of parties, to the chancery court of another county.

Code 1858, § 4308 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 4, § 10); Shan., § 6118; mod. Code 1932, § 10386; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-618.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 47.

Collateral References. 21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 502, 507.

72 C.J.S. Process § 32.

16-11-202. Relief from firearm disabilities imposed on persons adjudicated as mental defective or judicially committed to mental institution.

A person who is subject to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4) because the person has been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution, as defined in § 16-11-206, may petition the chancery court that entered the judicial commitment or adjudication order or the chancery court where the petitioner resides for relief from the firearm disabilities imposed by the adjudication or judicial commitment; provided, that the person may not petition the court until three (3) years from the date of release from commitment or the date of the adjudication order, whichever is later.

A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the original judicial commitment or adjudication occurred. The district attorney general may appear, support, object to, or present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner.

The court shall receive and consider evidence in an open proceeding, including evidence offered by the petitioner, concerning:

The circumstances that led to the imposition of the firearms disability under 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4);

The petitioner's mental health records;

The petitioner's criminal history;

The petitioner's reputation; and

Changes in the petitioner's condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought.

The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence and enters into the record the following:

The petitioner is no longer likely to act in a manner that is dangerous to public safety; and

Granting the relief would not be contrary to the public interest.

A record of the proceedings, to be provided by the petitioner, shall be made by a certified court reporter or by court-approved electronic means.

The petitioner may appeal a final order denying the requested relief, and the review on appeal, if granted, shall be de novo.

A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two (2) years.

Relief from a firearm disability granted under this section has no effect on the loss of civil rights, including firearm rights, for any reason other than the particular adjudication as a mental defective or judicial commitment to a mental institution from which relief is granted.

When the court issues an order granting a petition of relief under subsection (d), the court clerk shall, as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after issuance, forward a copy of the order to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI). The TBI, upon receipt of the order, shall:

Immediately forward a copy of the order to the department of safety;

Update the National Instant Criminal Background Check System database and transmit the corrected records to the federal bureau of investigation; and

Remove and destroy all records relating to the petition for relief from any database over which the TBI exercises control.

The TBI and the department of safety shall not use or permit the use of the records or information obtained or retained pursuant to this section for any purpose not specified in this section.

Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-11-202 (Acts 1909, ch. 551, § 2; Shan., § 5745a5; Code 1932, § 9941; Acts 1941, ch. 47, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 9945.1-9945.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 16-619 — 16-623), concerning adjourned terms, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 22. For provisions abolishing terms of court, see § 16-2-510.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 6. July 1, 2015.

16-11-203. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-11-203 (Code 1858, § 4305; Shan., § 6115; Code 1932, § 10383; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 16-624), concerning action in personam, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 753, § 1.

16-11-204. Counterpart summons.

Counterpart summons, accompanied by copies of the bill, may be issued to any other counties of the state for defendants not to be found in the county in which the suit is properly brought.

Code 1858, § 4306 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 57, § 1); Shan., § 6116; Code 1932, § 10384; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-625.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 54; 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 13, 27.

Cited: Wilkins v. Jetton, 8 Tenn. App. 641, — S.W.2d —, 1928 Tenn. App. LEXIS 187 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1928); Minor v. E. I. Du Pont De Nemours & Co., 164 Tenn. 226, 47 S.W.2d 748, 1931 Tenn. LEXIS 26 (1932).

16-11-205. Process to other counties in general.

If the suit is properly instituted, attachments, injunctions, and all other process known to the court, and necessary to attain the ends of justice, may be issued to any other county.

Code 1858, § 4307; Shan., § 6117; Code 1932, § 10385; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-626.

16-11-206. Information to be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS index and the department of safety by those chancery courts in which commitments to a mental institution are ordered.

As used in this section:

“Adjudication as a mental defective or adjudicated as a mental defective” means:

A determination by a court in this state that a person, as a result of marked subnormal intelligence, mental illness, incompetency, condition or disease:

Is a danger to such person or to others; or

Lacks the ability to contract or manage such person's own affairs due to mental defect;

A finding of insanity by a court in a criminal proceeding; or

A finding that a person is incompetent to stand trial or is found not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to §§ 50a and 72b of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, codified in 10 U.S.C. §§ 850a, 876b;

“Judicial commitment to a mental institution” means a judicially ordered involuntary admission to a private or state hospital or treatment resource in proceedings conducted pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or 7;

“Mental institution” means a mental health facility, mental hospital, sanitarium, psychiatric facility and any other facility that provides diagnoses by a licensed professional of mental retardation or mental illness, including, but not limited to, a psychiatric ward in a general hospital; and

“Treatment resource” means any public or private facility, service or program providing treatment or rehabilitation services for mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, including, but not limited to, detoxification centers, hospitals, community mental health centers, clinics or programs, halfway houses and rehabilitation centers.

Those chancery courts wherein commitments to a mental institution are ordered pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or chapter 7 or persons are adjudicated as a mental defective shall enter a standing and continuing order instructing the clerk to collect and report as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such an order or adjudication, information described in subsection (c) regarding individuals who have been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution for the purposes of complying with the NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, P.L. 110-180.

The following information shall be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS index and the department of safety, pursuant to subsection (b):

Complete name and all aliases of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, including, but not limited to, any names that the individual may have had or currently has by reason of marriage or otherwise;

Case or docket number of the judicial commitment or the adjudication as a mental defective;

Date judicial commitment ordered or adjudication as a mental defective was made;

Private or state hospital or treatment resource to which the individual was judicially committed;

Date of birth of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, if such information has been provided to the clerk;

Race and sex of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective; and

Social security number of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective if available.

The information in subdivisions (c)(1)–(7), the confidentiality of which is protected by other statutes or regulations, shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection pursuant to such statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceeding pursuant to §§ 38-6-109, 39-17-1316, and 39-17-1352 — 39-17-1354.

Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 2; 2013, ch. 300, § 4; 2019, ch. 262, §§ 5, 6.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “collect and report as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such an order or adjudication” for “collect and report January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of every year beginning January 1, 2010” in (b).

The 2019 amendment added (c)(6) and (c)(7); and, in (d), substituted “subdivisions (c)(1)-(7)” for “subdivisions (c)(1)-(5)”, and substituted “proceeding pursuant to §§ 38-6-109, 39-17-1316, and 39-17-1352 - 39-17-1354” for “proceedings pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 13. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2013, ch. 300, § 11. July 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, ch. 262, § 7. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Chapters 12-14

[Reserved]